Massachusetts, session 194th, H3098.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 62 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following new section:-
Section 65. Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule regulation to the contrary,
for taxable years 2025 and 2026, there shall be deducted from adjusted gross income in
determining income: a deduction for the costs of home heating oil for which the cost per gallon
of oil exceeds $4.00, up to $800 maximum.
The deductions may be used only for the cost of home heating oil, natural gas and
propane purchased between November 1, 2025 and March 31, 2026.
Any taxpayer entitled to a deduction under this section may apply the deduction in
taxable year 2025 for purchases made in 2025. If the taxpayer does not take deduct the full $800
of 2

deduction in taxable year 2025, the taxpayer may take the remainder in taxable year 2026 for
purchases made in 2026 through March 31, 2026.
The commissioner of revenue shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to
implement this section. The commissioner shall also include in such rules and regulations
eligibility provisions for a taxpayer who owns a condominium or a cooperative dwelling and for
whom such purchases are accounted for in a common area fee or special assessment against such
costs as may be reasonably attributed to the percentage ownership share of the condominium or
cooperative dwelling costs; and provided further, that the commissioner shall also include in
such rules and regulations eligibility provisions for a taxpayer who rents a residential dwelling
and for whom such purchases are accounted for in the rent and provisions that account for
multiple renters in a residential dwelling. The department shall file a copy of any rules and
regulations with the clerks of the senate and house of representatives and with the joint
committee on revenue.
of 2